Hawaii statutes.
[§321-34] Cytomegalovirus public
education. (a) The department of health shall provide public education to
inform pregnant women and women who may become pregnant regarding:

(1) The transmission of the cytomegalovirus to
pregnant women and women who may become pregnant;

(2) Birth defects caused by congenital
cytomegalovirus;

(3) Methods of diagnosing congenital cytomegalovirus;
and

(4) Available preventative measures.

(b) The department of health shall provide the
information described in subsection (a) to:

(1) Hospitals licensed pursuant to section 321-14.5;

(2) Health care providers offering care to pregnant
women and infants;

(3) Registered family child care homes;

(4) Licensed group child care centers;

(5) Licensed group child care homes;

(6) Licensed infant and toddler child care centers;
and

(7) Religious, ecclesiastical, or denominational
organizations offering children's programs as a part of worship services. [L
2015, c 232, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next